testing/kom-tests-kyjny.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../bin/kom-gen.hfstol
    Morph: ../bin/kom-mor.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../bin/ikom.fst
    Morph: ../bin/kom.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - кыйны: # Verb1 in j
     кыйны+V+ConNeg+Pl3: кыйны
     кыйны+V+ConNeg: кый
     кыйны+V+Imprt+Sg2: кый
     кыйны+V+Imprt+Pl2: кыйӧй
     кыйны+V+Inf+NoComparison: кыйны
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+NoComparison: кыя
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+NoComparison: кыян
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+NoComparison: кыйӧ
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+NoComparison: [кыям, кыямӧй]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кыямӧ
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+NoComparison: кыянныд
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кыяд
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+NoComparison: кыйӧны
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1+NoComparison: кыя
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2+NoComparison: кыян
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3+NoComparison: кыяс
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+NoComparison: [кыям, кыямӧй]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кыямӧ
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+NoComparison: кыянныд
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кыяд
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3+NoComparison: кыясны
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+NoComparison: кыйи
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+NoComparison: кыйин
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+NoComparison: [кыйис, кыйи]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+NoComparison: [кыйим, кыйимӧй]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кыйимӧ
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+NoComparison: кыйинныд
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кыйид
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+NoComparison: [кыйисны, кыйины]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1+NoComparison: кыйӧма
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2+NoComparison: кыйӧмыд
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3+NoComparison: кыйӧма
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1+NoComparison: кыйӧмаӧсь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2+NoComparison: [кыйӧмныд, кыйӧмныдӧсь]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3+NoComparison: [кыйӧмаӧсь, кыйӧмны]
     кыйны+V+Inf+Der/моз: кыйнымоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Der/моз: кыямоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Der/моз: кыянмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Der/моз: кыйӧмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Der/моз: [кыяммоз, кыямӧймоз]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кыямӧмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Der/моз: кыянныдмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кыядмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Der/моз: кыйӧнымоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1+Der/моз: кыямоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2+Der/моз: кыянмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3+Der/моз: кыясмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Der/моз: [кыяммоз, кыямӧймоз]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кыямӧмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Der/моз: кыянныдмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кыядмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3+Der/моз: кыяснымоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+Der/моз: кыйимоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+Der/моз: кыйинмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+Der/моз: [кыйисмоз, кыйимоз]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Der/моз: [кыйиммоз, кыйимӧймоз]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кыйимӧмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Der/моз: кыйинныдмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кыйидмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+Der/моз: [кыйиснымоз, кыйинымоз]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1+Der/моз: кыйӧмамоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2+Der/моз: кыйӧмыдмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3+Der/моз: кыйӧмамоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1+Der/моз: кыйӧмаӧсьмоз
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2+Der/моз: [кыйӧмныдмоз, кыйӧмныдӧсьмоз]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3+Der/моз: [кыйӧмаӧсьмоз, кыйӧмнымоз]
     кыйны+V+Inf+Der/кодь: кыйныкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Der/кодь: кыякодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Der/кодь: кыянкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Der/кодь: кыйӧкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Der/кодь: [кыямкодь, кыямӧйкодь]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кыямӧкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Der/кодь: кыянныдкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кыядкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Der/кодь: кыйӧныкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1+Der/кодь: кыякодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2+Der/кодь: кыянкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3+Der/кодь: кыяскодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Der/кодь: [кыямкодь, кыямӧйкодь]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кыямӧкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Der/кодь: кыянныдкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кыядкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3+Der/кодь: кыясныкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+Der/кодь: кыйикодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+Der/кодь: кыйинкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+Der/кодь: [кыйискодь, кыйикодь]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Der/кодь: [кыйимкодь, кыйимӧйкодь]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кыйимӧкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Der/кодь: кыйинныдкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кыйидкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+Der/кодь: [кыйисныкодь, кыйиныкодь]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1+Der/кодь: кыйӧмакодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2+Der/кодь: кыйӧмыдкодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3+Der/кодь: кыйӧмакодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1+Der/кодь: кыйӧмаӧськодь
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2+Der/кодь: [кыйӧмныдкодь, кыйӧмныдӧськодь]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3+Der/кодь: [кыйӧмаӧськодь, кыйӧмныкодь]
     кыйны+V+Inf+Compar: кыйныджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Compar: кыяджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Compar: кыянджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Compar: кыйӧджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Compar: [кыямджык, кыямӧйджык]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Use/Sub+Compar: кыямӧджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Compar: кыянныдджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Use/Sub+Compar: кыядджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Compar: кыйӧныджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1+Compar: кыяджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2+Compar: кыянджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3+Compar: кыясджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Compar: [кыямджык, кыямӧйджык]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Use/Sub+Compar: кыямӧджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Compar: кыянныдджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Use/Sub+Compar: кыядджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3+Compar: кыясныджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+Compar: кыйиджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+Compar: кыйинджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+Compar: [кыйисджык, кыйиджык]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Compar: [кыйимджык, кыйимӧйджык]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Use/Sub+Compar: кыйимӧджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Compar: кыйинныдджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Use/Sub+Compar: кыйидджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+Compar: [кыйисныджык, кыйиныджык]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1+Compar: кыйӧмаджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2+Compar: кыйӧмыдджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3+Compar: кыйӧмаджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1+Compar: кыйӧмаӧсьджык
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2+Compar: [кыйӧмныдджык, кыйӧмныдӧсьджык]
     кыйны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3+Compar: [кыйӧмаӧсьджык, кыйӧмныджык]
     кыйны+V+Der/мысьт: кыймысьт
     кыйны+V+Der/мысь: кыймысь
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl: кыйигъяс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill: кыйигъясӧ
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: кыйигъясам
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: кыйигъясад
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: кыйигъясас
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: кыйигъясаным
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: кыйигъясаныд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: кыйигъясаныс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill: кыйигӧ
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: кыйигам
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: кыйигад
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: кыйигас
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: кыйиганым
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: кыйиганыд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: кыйиганыс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+NoPoss: кыйигъясӧн
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+PxSg2: кыйигъясӧныд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+PxSg3: кыйигъясӧныс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+PxPl1: кыйигъясӧнным
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+PxPl2: кыйигъясӧнныд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+PxPl3: кыйигъясӧнныс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+NoPoss: кыйигӧн
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+PxSg2: кыйигӧныд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+PxSg3: кыйигӧныс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+PxPl1: кыйигӧнным
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+PxPl2: кыйигӧнныд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+PxPl3: кыйигӧнныс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+NoPoss: кыйигмоз
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+PxSg2: кыйигмозыд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+PxSg3: кыйигмозыс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+PxPl1: кыйигмозным
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+PxPl2: кыйигмозныд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+PxPl3: кыйигмозныс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/сор: кыйигсор
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/сор+Instr: кыйигсорӧн
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тыр: кыйигтыр
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+NoPoss: кыйигтырйи
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+PxSg2: кыйигтырйиыд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+PxSg3: кыйигтырйиыс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+PxPl1: кыйигтырйиным
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+PxPl2: кыйигтырйиныд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+PxPl3: кыйигтырйиныс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тыръя: кыйигтыръя
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+NoPoss: кыйигчӧж
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+PxSg2: кыйигчӧжыд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+PxSg3: кыйигчӧжыс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+PxPl1: кыйигчӧжным
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+PxPl2: кыйигчӧжныд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+PxPl3: кыйигчӧжныс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+Instr: кыйигчӧжӧн
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+NoPoss: кыйигкості
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+PxSg2: кыйигкостіыд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+PxSg3: кыйигкостіыс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+PxPl1: кыйигкостіным
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+PxPl2: кыйигкостіныд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+PxPl3: кыйигкостіныс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/коста: кыйигкоста
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ: кыйигкежлӧ
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxSg2: кыйигкежлад
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxSg3: кыйигкежлас
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxPl1: кыйигкежланым
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxPl2: кыйигкежланыд
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxPl3: кыйигкежланыс
     кыйны+V+ANA+Adv: кыяна
     кыйны+V+ANAA+Adv: кыянаа
     кыйны+V+AN+Der/моз+NoPoss: кыянмоз
     кыйны+V+AN+Der/моз+PxSg2: кыянмозыд
     кыйны+V+AN+Der/моз+PxSg3: кыянмозыс
     кыйны+V+AN+Der/моз+PxPl1: кыянмозным
     кыйны+V+AN+Der/моз+PxPl2: кыянмозныд
     кыйны+V+AN+Der/моз+PxPl3: кыянмозныс
     кыйны+V+Der/ӧм+Event+N+Instr: кыйӧмӧн
     кыйны+V+Der/тӧдз+NoPoss: кыйтӧдз
     кыйны+V+Der/тӧдз+PxSg2: кыйтӧдзыд
     кыйны+V+Der/тӧдз+PxSg3: кыйтӧдзыс
     кыйны+V+Der/тӧдз+PxPl1: кыйтӧдзным
     кыйны+V+Der/тӧдз+PxPl2: кыйтӧдзныд
     кыйны+V+Der/тӧдз+PxPl3: кыйтӧдзныс
     кыйны+V+Der/мӧн+NoPoss: кыймӧн
     кыйны+V+Der/мӧн+PxSg2: кыймӧныд
     кыйны+V+Der/мӧн+PxSg3: кыймӧныс
     кыйны+V+Der/мӧн+PxPl1: кыймӧнным
     кыйны+V+Der/мӧн+PxPl2: кыймӧнныд
     кыйны+V+Der/мӧн+PxPl3: кыймӧнныс
     кыйны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger: кыйиг
